Arkansas, session 2025, SB310.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 26-37-202(b)(1)(B), concerning the
procedure to sell tax-delinquent property, is amended to read as follows:
(B) The Commissioner of State Lands may conduct a tax-
delinquent property auction or an unsold-property auction under subdivision
(b)(1)(A) of this section online.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 26-37-202(e)(1)(A), concerning the
procedure to sell tax-delinquent property, is amended to read as follows:
(e)(1)(A) If a tax-delinquent parcel is to be offered at an in-person
a tax-delinquent property auction, then at least thirty (30) calendar days
before the date of the sale the Commissioner of State Lands shall notify the
*JLL159*
02/26/2025 8:19:09 AM JLL159

SB310
owner and all interested parties by regular mail of the right to redeem the
parcel before 4:00 p.m. central standard time (CST) on the last business day
before the date of the sale by paying all taxes, penalties, interest, and
costs due, including the cost of the notice.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 26-37-202(e)(3)(A), concerning the
procedure to sell tax-delinquent property, is amended to read as follows:
(3)(A) If a parcel subject to subdivision (e)(1)(A) of this
section is not redeemed by the deadline stated in subdivision (e)(1)(A) of
this section, the parcel shall be offered for sale at an in-person a tax-
delinquent auction, and if sold, a limited warranty deed shall be issued by
the Commissioner of State Lands to the purchaser.
























02/26/2025 8:19:09 AM JLL159